da: Design for racerdragtmanchet: Boot-cut/bred ankel; Elastisk manchet; Strikket manchet; Lige søm; Tommelfingerstrop (håndled); Andet
fi: Kilpapuvun hihan- ja jalansuiden muotoilu: Bootcut / levenevä lahje; Joustinranneke; Neulottu resori; Suora helma; Peukalolenkki (ranne); Muu
nl: Racepak manchetontwerp: Bootcut / flared enkel; Elastische manchet; Gebreide manchet; Rechte zoom; Duimlus (pols); Overig
en: Racing suit cuff design: Boot-cut / flared ankle; Elastic cuff; Knitted cuff; Straight hem; Thumb loop (wrist); Other
ru: Конструкция манжет гоночного костюма: Клеш от колена / расклешенная лодыжка; Эластичная манжета; Вязаная манжета; Прямой нижний край; Петля для большого пальца (на запястье); Другое
bg-BG: Дизайн на маншетите на състезателния костюм.: Разкроен крачол / разширен глезен; Еластичен маншет; Плетен маншет; Прав подгъв; Халка за палеца (китка); Друго
el: Σχεδιασμός μανικιών αγωνιστικής φόρμας: Bootcut / σε γραμμή καμπάνα στους αστραγάλους; Ελαστική μανσέτα; Πλεκτή μανσέτα; Ίσιο τελείωμα; Θηλιά αντίχειρα (καρπός); Άλλο
ro-RO: Designul manșetei costumului de curse: Croială boot-cut/evazată la gleznă; Manșetă elastică; Manșetă tricotată; Tiv drept; Buclă pentru degetul mare (încheietură); Altele
lt-LT: Lenktyninio kostiumo rankogalių dizainas: Batams pritaikyta / platėjanti kulkšnis; Elastinis rankogalis; Megztas rankogalis; Tiesus atvartas; Su nykščio kilpa (riešui); Kita
it: Design del polsino della tuta da corsa: Taglio per stivali/caviglia svasata; Polsino elastico; Polsino in maglia; Orlo dritto; Asola per pollice (polso); Altro
pt-PT: Design dos punhos do fato de corrida: Corte largo para bota/tornozelo largo; Punho elástico; Punho de malha; Bainha direita; Abertura para polegar (pulso); Outro
ja: レーシングスーツの袖口デザイン: ブーツカット / フレアアンクル; 伸縮性カフ; ニットカフ; ストレートヘム; サムループ (手首); その他
pt-BR: Macacão de corrida design do punho: Corte para bota / tornozelo largo; Punho elástico; Punho tricotado; Bainha reta; Abertura para o polegar (punho); Outros
hu: Versenyoverál mandzsettakialakítása: Trapéz/bővülő szár; Gumírozott mandzsetta; Kötött mandzsetta; Egyenes alsó szegély; Hüvelykujj-bújtató (csukló); Egyéb
zh-CN: 赛车服袖口/裤口设计: 微喇/喇叭裤脚; 弹性袖口; 针织袖口; 直筒下摆; 拇指扣（腕部）; 其他
sv: Design av manschett på racingdräkten: Bootcut/utsvängd ankel; Elastisk mudd; Stickad mudd; Rak fåll; Tummögla (handled); Övrigt
nb: Mansjettdesign for racingdress: Bootcut / utsvingt ankel; Elastisk mansjett; Strikket mansjett; Rett fald; Tommelhull (håndledd); Annet
sk-SK: Dizajn manžety pretekárskeho obleku: Rozšírený/zvonový členok; Elastická manžeta; Pletená manžeta; Rovný lem; Slučka na palec (zápästie); Iné
ko: 레이싱 슈트 소매 디자인: 부츠컷/플레어 앵클; 신축성 커프; 니트 커프; 스트레이트 밑단; 썸 루프(손목); 기타
tr: Yarış tulumu manşet tasarımı: Bot kesim / bol paça; Elastik manşet; Örgü manşet; Düz kenar; Başparmak deliği (bilek); Diğer
de: Manschettendesign des Rennanzugs: Bootcut / Ausgestellter Knöchel; Elastisches Bündchen; Strickbündchen; Gerader Saum; Daumenschlaufe (Handgelenk); Sonstige
th: ดีไซน์ข้อมือชุดแข่งรถ: ทรงขาม้า / ปลายขาบาน; ปลายแขนยางยืด; ปลายแขนถัก; ปลายขาตรง; คล้องนิ้วหัวแม่มือ (ข้อมือ); อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Zasnova patentov dirkalnega kombinezona: Kroj na zvonec / širok gleženj; Elastičen patent; Pleten patent; Raven rob; Zanka za palec (zapestje); Drugo
es: Diseño de puños para traje de carreras: Corte de bota/tobillo acampanado; Puño elástico; Puño tejido; Dobladillo recto; Lazo para el pulgar (muñeca); Otro
pl: Projekt mankietu kombinezonu wyścigowego: Nogawka boot-cut / rozszerzana; Elastyczny mankiet; Dzianinowy mankiet; Prosty brzeg; Pętla na kciuk (nadgarstek); Inne
vi: Thiết kế cổ tay áo bộ đồ đua: Boot-cut / Ống loe; Bo co giãn; Bo dệt kim; Gấu suông; Xỏ ngón cái (cổ tay); Khác
fr: Finition des bords de la combinaison de course: Coupe bootcut / cheville évasée; Poignet élastique; Poignet en tricot; Ourlet droit; Passe-pouce (poignet); Autre
hr-HR: Dizajn manžete odijela za utrku: Široki kroj / zvonasti gležanj; Elastična manžeta; Pletena manžeta; Ravni rub; Omča za palac (zapešće); Ostalo
cs: Design manžety závodní kombinézy: Rozšířené nohavice (boot-cut); Elastická manžeta; Pletená manžeta; Rovný lem; Otvor pro palec (zápěstí); Ostatní
zh-TW: 賽車服袖口/褲口設計: 靴型 / 喇叭型褲管; 彈性袖口; 針織袖口; 直筒下擺; 拇指環 (手腕); 其他